udm.dic
айыны/V1V3
акайыны/V1V3
анйыны/V1V3
арйыны/V1V3
будыны-пушйыны/V1V3
буревайыны/V1V3
бурйыны/V1V3
бурсйыны/V1V3
бырйыны/V1V3
вайыны/V1V3
вогйыны/V1V3
вожвайыны/V1V3
вӧжйыны/V1V3
вушйыны/V1V3
выйыны/V1V3
гойыны/V1V3
гужемйыны/V1V3
гужйыны/V1V3
гыркйыны/V1V3
дурвайыны/V1V3
ӝубйыны/V1V3
ӝужйыны/V1V3
йылыны-пушйыны/V1V3
йырйыны/V1V3
кайыны/V1V3
кепыр-вайыны/V1V3
куайыны/V1V3
кузйыны/V1V3
куйыны/V1V3
кызйыны/V1V3
лайвайыны/V1V3
лайыны/V1V3
лусйыны/V1V3
масайыны/V1V3
муртайыны/V1V3
мыркйыны/V1V3
нуыны-вайыны/V1V3
пужйыны/V1V3
пусйыны/V1V3
пушйыны/V1V3
пызйыны/V1V3
пырсйыны/V1V3
синйыны/V1V3
сузьйыны/V1V3
суйыны/V1V3
сукырайыны/V1V3
сюйыны/V1V3
тайыны/V1V3
тӥйыны/V1V3
толйыны/V1V3
туйыны/V1V3
тулысйыны/V1V3
уйыны/V1V3
умйыны/V1V3
ӵашйыны/V1V3
чизйыны/V1V3
ӵогйыны/V1V3
чызйыны/V1V3
ымйыны/V1V3
эсайыны/V1V3
адӟытъяны/V1V4
азьвераны/V1V4
айшонаны/V1V4
альсыралляны/V1V4
анланы/V1V4
арланы/V1V4
бадӟыманы/V1V4
барышалляны/V1V4
бекмылляны/V1V4
берганы/V1V4
билёуаны/V1V4
бирдыяны/V1V4
бӧмъялляны/V1V4
бордъяны/V1V4
борыяны/V1V4
бугораны/V1V4
буёлалляны/V1V4
булавкияны/V1V4
бурдъялляны/V1V4
бутыркаяны/V1V4
быганы/V1V4
бызланы/V1V4
бырданы/V1V4
бычыялляны/V1V4
вадьсаны/V1V4
вайялляны/V1V4
валаны/V1V4
ваменпуалляны/V1V4
вараны/V1V4
ватъяны/V1V4
векалляны/V1V4
венчаны/V1V4
верттаны/V1V4
веттаны/V1V4
визнаны/V1V4
визьнодалляны/V1V4
визяны/V1V4
висъетаны/V1V4
воганы/V1V4
вожвылъяны/V1V4
возьманы/V1V4
вӧлъяны/V1V4
волятъяны/V1V4
воротаяны/V1V4
вӧсяны/V1V4
вӧяны/V1V4
вужмытъяны/V1V4
выаны/V1V4
выжыялляны/V1V4
выльданы/V1V4
гажалляны/V1V4
герданы/V1V4
гожмалляны/V1V4
гольканы/V1V4
гопаны/V1V4
горъяны/V1V4
губияны/V1V4
гужатъяны/V1V4
гурӟытъяны/V1V4
гыалляны/V1V4
гылдаръяны/V1V4
гырдалляны/V1V4
дантэманы/V1V4
дӥсялляны/V1V4
долкалляны/V1V4
дорожниканы/V1V4
дунматъяны/V1V4
дуръяны/V1V4
дыльдыяны/V1V4
дэмлалляны/V1V4
егитмытъяны/V1V4
езъяны/V1V4
ёзъяны/V1V4
ёрмытъяны/V1V4
жальгатъяны/V1V4
ӝеганы/V1V4
жильыраны/V1V4
ӝожалляны/V1V4
ӝоманы/V1V4
ӝужаны/V1V4
ӝуяны/V1V4
забораны/V1V4
ӟалтыраны/V1V4
зарниялляны/V1V4
ӟечбураны/V1V4
зӥбылъяны/V1V4
ӟимыраны/V1V4
золаны/V1V4
ӟугалляны/V1V4
ӟузгалляны/V1V4
зурканы/V1V4
зыбкаялляны/V1V4
зынъялляны/V1V4
зырыманы/V1V4
изваскаялляны/V1V4
интыялляны/V1V4
исьнералляны/V1V4
йӧжманы/V1V4
йӧнатъяны/V1V4
йыгыръялляны/V1V4
йылсаны/V1V4
йыромытъяны/V1V4
кайдырланы/V1V4
калтыраны/V1V4
канжаны/V1V4
капланы/V1V4
караканы/V1V4
карылляны/V1V4
катьяны/V1V4
кезьытаны/V1V4
кемалляны/V1V4
керланы/V1V4
кеӵевылъяны/V1V4
кизераны/V1V4
кирганы/V1V4
киськалляны/V1V4
клеймояны/V1V4
кӧбератъяны/V1V4
козманы/V1V4
кӧкыялляны/V1V4
колӟаны/V1V4
конгыляны/V1V4
копаны/V1V4
кормышъяны/V1V4
кортӵогалляны/V1V4
косталляны/V1V4
кӧтӝожаны/V1V4
кӧтуланы/V1V4
кӧшалляны/V1V4
кӧяны/V1V4
куалекъялляны/V1V4
куачыръяны/V1V4
кудӟаны/V1V4
кужмоятъяны/V1V4
кузьыралляны/V1V4
кукияны/V1V4
культоялляны/V1V4
кунаны/V1V4
купыръяны/V1V4
курекъялляны/V1V4
куроканы/V1V4
кусыланы/V1V4
кутъяны/V1V4
кушалляны/V1V4
кыданы/V1V4
кызялляны/V1V4
кылӥтэтаны/V1V4
кыминъяны/V1V4
кырӟаны-вераны/V1V4
кыршаны/V1V4
кысканы/V1V4
кытуланы/V1V4
кышкатъяны/V1V4
ладъяны/V1V4
ланьыралляны/V1V4
лапкатъяны/V1V4
лекатъяны/V1V4
либалляны/V1V4
лияны/V1V4
лӧбъяны/V1V4
лопыръяны/V1V4
лошъялляны/V1V4
лулъяны/V1V4
лыдъялляны/V1V4
лысвуаны/V1V4
лэзяны/V1V4
лэчканы/V1V4
люканы/V1V4
лябомытъяны/V1V4
майталаны/V1V4
малпаны/V1V4
машагатланы/V1V4
меланы/V1V4
мискыляны/V1V4
мӧляны/V1V4
мульыяны/V1V4
муртаны/V1V4
муялляны/V1V4
мыжланы/V1V4
мыньыкъялляны/V1V4
нажгатъяны/V1V4
нарваялляны/V1V4
небыталляны/V1V4
нёредалляны/V1V4
ниманы/V1V4
ниръяны/V1V4
нугылляны/V1V4
нуялляны/V1V4
нылпияны/V1V4
ныръялляны/V1V4
ньӧраны/V1V4
нюланы/V1V4
нязылъяны/V1V4
нярӟытъяны/V1V4
обояны/V1V4
огтусаны/V1V4
ожмалляны/V1V4
омыръяны/V1V4
орекияны/V1V4
ӧтчалляны/V1V4
пазниканы/V1V4
палдытъяны/V1V4
палэнъяны/V1V4
паньсаны/V1V4
пачкалляны/V1V4
пеньмалляны/V1V4
писыраны/V1V4
погманы/V1V4
пӧзьыраны/V1V4
пӧрмытъяны/V1V4
пӧсятъяны/V1V4
пузаны/V1V4
пуньмалляны/V1V4
путэганы/V1V4
пызганы/V1V4
пыртчаны/V1V4
рифмаяны/V1V4
сайлалляны/V1V4
санъяны/V1V4
серекъяны-мактаны/V1V4
сигъяны/V1V4
сиресалляны/V1V4
сӧзнэтаны/V1V4
сульпалляны/V1V4
сурымӟаны/V1V4
сьӧлыканы/V1V4
сюреланы/V1V4
тазманы/V1V4
тачкесаны/V1V4
тодыны-валаны/V1V4
тӧрнаны/V1V4
туланы/V1V4
тупатъялляны/V1V4
тыгыляны/V1V4
тэбетаны/V1V4
тэчыраны/V1V4
удысалляны/V1V4
узыялляны-борыялляны/V1V4
уктоаны/V1V4
умитьланы/V1V4
урдэсъяны/V1V4
усыялляны/V1V4
утюганы/V1V4
чажланы/V1V4
чебераны/V1V4
честаны/V1V4
чиляны/V1V4
ӵоксалляны/V1V4
чотаны/V1V4
чуланы/V1V4
чусомытъяны/V1V4
чынланы/V1V4
шапраяны/V1V4
шенгыляны/V1V4
ширъялляны/V1V4
шӧматъяны/V1V4
шормалляны/V1V4
шукыръяны/V1V4
шуэрскытъяны/V1V4
шыръялляны/V1V4
ырадъяны/V1V4
эзыланы/V1V4
эрканы/V1V4
юаны-вераны/V1V4
юзмалляны/V1V4
юрмульыяны/V1V4
ямъяны/V1V4
брендъяны/V1V4 # С.М.
сканъяны/V1V4 # С.М.
вожвылъяськаны/V1V4 # С.М.
